Indiana, session 2026, HB1106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-149.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.174-2025,
SECTION 13, AND P.L.243-2025, SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 149.1.
"Provider" means the following:
(1) For purposes of IC 12-10-7, the meaning set forth in
IC 12-10-7-3.
(2) For purposes of the following statutes, an individual, a
partnership, a corporation, or a governmental entity that is
enrolled in the Medicaid program under rules adopted under
IC 4-22-2 by the office of Medicaid policy and planning:
(A) IC 12-14-1 through IC 12-14-8.
(B) IC 12-15, except IC 12-15-32, IC 12-15-33, and
IC 12-15-34.
(C) IC 12-17.6.
(3) Except as provided in subdivisions (4) and (6), for purposes
of IC 12-17.2, a person who operates a child care center or child
care home under IC 12-17.2.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(4) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-3.5, a person that:
(A) provides child care; and
(B) is directly paid for the provision of the child care under the
federal Child Care and Development Fund voucher program
administered under 45 CFR 98 and 45 CFR 99.
The term does not include an individual who provides services to
a person described in clauses (A) and (B), regardless of whether
the individual receives compensation.
(5) For purposes of IC 12-21-1 through IC 12-29-2, an
organization:
(A) that:
(i) provides mental health services, as defined under 42
U.S.C. 300x-2(c);
(ii) provides addiction services; or
(iii) provides children's mental health services;
(B) that has entered into a provider agreement with the
division of mental health and addiction under IC 12-21-2-7 to
provide services in the least restrictive, most appropriate
setting; and
(C) that is operated by one (1) of the following:
(i) A city, town, county, or other political subdivision of the
state.
(ii) An agency of the state or of the United States.
(iii) A political subdivision of another state.
(iv) A hospital owned or operated by a unit of government
or a building authority that is organized for the purpose of
constructing facilities to be leased to units of government.
(v) A corporation incorporated under IC 23-7-1.1 (before its
repeal August 1, 1991) or IC 23-17.
(vi) An organization that is exempt from federal income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code.
(vii) A university or college.
(6) For purposes of IC 12-17.2-2-10, the following:
(A) A person described in subdivision (4).
(B) A child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4 or
registered under IC 12-17.2-6.
(C) A child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5.
(7) For purposes of IC 12-11-13, an authorized provider entity
that delivers services administered by the bureau of disabilities
services.
SECTION 2. IC 12-17.2-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The division shall perform the
following duties:
(1) Administer the licensing and monitoring of child care centers
or child care homes in accordance with this article.
(2) Ensure that a national criminal history background check of
the following is completed through the state police department
under IC 10-13-3-39 before issuing a license:
(A) An applicant for a license.
(B) An employee or volunteer of an applicant who may be
present on the premises of the child care center or child care
home during the operating hours of the child care center or
child care home.
(C) If an applicant is applying for a license to operate a child
care home, the following:
(i) The applicant's spouse.
(ii) The applicant's household members who are at least
eighteen (18) years of age or who are less than eighteen (18)
years of age but have previously been waived from juvenile
court to adult court.
(3) Ensure that a national criminal history background check of
the following is completed through the state police department
under IC 10-13-3-39 before registering a child care ministry:
(A) An applicant for a child care ministry registration.
(B) An employee or volunteer of an applicant who may be
present on the premises of the child care ministry during the
operating hours of the child care ministry.
(4) Provide for the issuance, denial, suspension, and revocation of
licenses.
(5) Cooperate with governing bodies of child care centers and
child care homes and their staffs to improve standards of child
care.
(6) Prepare at least biannually a directory of licensees with a
description of the program capacity and type of children served
that will be distributed to the legislature, licensees, and other
interested parties as a public document.
(7) Deposit all license application fees collected under section 2
of this chapter in the division of family resources child care fund
established by section 3 of this chapter.
(8) Require each child care center or child care home to record
proof of a child's date of birth before accepting the child. A child's
date of birth may be proven by the child's original birth certificate
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


or other reliable proof of the child's date of birth, including a duly
attested transcript of a birth certificate.
(9) Provide a website through which members of the public may
obtain the following information:
(A) Information concerning violations of this article by a
licensed child care provider, including:
(i) the identity of the child care provider;
(ii) the date of the violation; and
(iii) action taken by the division in response to the violation.
(B) Current status of a child care provider's license.
(C) Other relevant information.
The website may not contain the address of a child care home or
information identifying an individual child. However, the website
may include the county and ZIP code in which a child care home
is located.
(10) Provide or approve training concerning safe sleeping
practices for children to:
(A) a provider who operates a child care program in the
provider's home as described in IC 12-17.2-3.5-12.5;
(B) a child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5;
(C) a child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4 or
registered under IC 12-17.2-6; and
(D) a child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
including practices to reduce the risk of sudden infant death
syndrome.
SECTION 3. IC 12-17.2-2-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The division shall exempt from licensure the
following programs:
(1) A program for children enrolled in grades kindergarten
through 12 that is operated by the department of education or a
public or private school.
(2) A program for children who become at least three (3) years of
age as of December 1 of a particular school year (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-17) that is operated by the department of education or
a public or private school.
(3) A nonresidential program for a child that provides child care
for less than four (4) hours a day.
(4) A recreation program for children that operates for not more
than ninety (90) days in a calendar year.
(5) A program whose primary purpose is to provide social,
recreational, or religious activities for school age children, such
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


as scouting, boys club, girls club, sports, or the arts.
(6) A program operated to serve migrant children that:
(A) provides services for children from migrant worker
families; and
(B) is operated during a single period of less than one hundred
twenty (120) consecutive days during a calendar year.
(7) A child care ministry or child care center registered under
IC 12-17.2-6.
(8) A child care home if the provider operates to serve migrant
children.
(9) A child care program operated by a public or private school
that does the following:
(A) Provides day care on school property for children in the
school corporation in which the public or private school is
located.
(B) Complies with health, safety, and sanitation standards as
determined by the division under section 4 of this chapter for
child care centers or in accordance with a variance or waiver
of a rule governing child care centers approved by the division
under section 10 of this chapter.
(C) Substantially complies with the fire and life safety rules as
determined by the state fire marshal under rules adopted by the
division under section 4 of this chapter for child care centers
or in accordance with a variance or waiver of a rule governing
child care centers approved by the division under section 10 of
this chapter.
(10) A school age child care program (commonly referred to as a
latch key program) established under IC 20-26-5-2 that is
operated by:
(A) the department of education;
(B) a public or private school; or
(C) a public or private organization under a written contract
with:
(i) the department of education; or
(ii) a public or private school.
(11) A child care program that:
(A) is operated by a public or private organization under a
contract with a public or private school;
(B) serves children who are enrolled in the public or private
school in:
(i) grades kindergarten through 12; or
(ii) a preschool program offered by a public or private
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


school as described in this subdivision; and
(C) serves children who are:
(i) attending school through remote or e-learning due to a
disaster emergency declared under IC 10-14-3-12 or
IC 10-14-3-29; or
(ii) participating in a learning recovery program that
administers an assessment to measure student learning loss
and provides Indiana academic standards aligned
instruction.
(12) An educational program:
(A) consisting of a group of not more than ten (10) students
who attend the educational program in lieu of attending
prekindergarten or kindergarten through grade 12 at a public
or private school;
(B) whose students meet in a single classroom in person or
outside a classroom and which may include mixed age level
groupings; and
(C) that is under the supervision of a teacher or tutor.
(13) If located in the same public or private school building:
(A) a preschool program that is operated by the public or
private school; and
(B) either or both of the following:
(i) A child care program described in subdivision (9).
(ii) A school age child care program described in
subdivision (10).
(14) A child care program operated by a public or private school
that does the following:
(A) Provides day care on school property for children of
employees of a business or organization with which the school
has entered into a contract to provide services. If the school
property is owned by the school, the school property must have
been both:
(i) owned by the school; and
(ii) used for child care;
on or before January 1, 2024.
(B) Complies with health, safety, and sanitation standards as
determined by the division under section 4 of this chapter for
child care centers or in accordance with a variance or waiver
of a rule governing child care centers approved by the division
under section 10 of this chapter.
(C) Substantially complies with the fire and life safety rules as
determined by the state fire marshal under rules adopted by the
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


division under section 4 of this chapter for child care centers
or in accordance with a variance or waiver of a rule governing
child care centers approved by the division under section 10 of
this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 12-17.2-3.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.121-2020,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A provider is ineligible to receive a voucher
payment if the provider:
(1) has been convicted of a:
(A) felony:
(i) related to the health or safety of a child;
(ii) that is a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2);
(iii) that is a dangerous felony; or
(iv) that is not a felony otherwise described in items (i)
through (iii), and less than ten (10) years have elapsed from
the date the person was discharged from probation,
imprisonment, or parole, whichever discharge date is latest;
(B) misdemeanor related to:
(i) the health or safety of a child; or
(ii) welfare fraud;
(C) misdemeanor for operating a child care center without a
license under IC 12-17.2-4-35, or of a substantially similar
offense committed in another jurisdiction if the offense is
directly or indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or
safety of a child; or
(D) misdemeanor for operating a child care home without a
license under IC 12-17.2-5-35, or of a substantially similar
offense committed in another jurisdiction if the offense is
directly or indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or
safety of a child;
(2) allows an individual who has been convicted of a crime
specified under subdivision (1) to reside with the provider, if the
provider operates a child care program in the provider's home;
(3) employs an individual or allows an individual to volunteer
who:
(A) may be on the premises of the facility where the provider
operates a child care program during operating hours of the
child care program; and
(B) has been convicted of a crime specified in subdivision (1);
(4) has had a revocation of eligibility under this chapter during
the immediately preceding two (2) years; or
(5) fails to meet the requirements of this chapter.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(b) A provider whose:
(1) license under IC 12-17.2-4 or IC 12-17.2-5; or
(2) compliance with this chapter;
is subject to an enforcement action is ineligible eligible to receive a
voucher payment, regardless of whether if the provider meets the
requirements of this chapter, until the outcome of any proceeding under
IC 4-21.5 reflects a final determination that the provider's license or
eligibility is no longer in good standing.
(c) Subject to subsection (e), if the division decertifies a provider
under this chapter, the provider:
(1) may reapply for eligibility to receive a voucher payment at any
time that the provider is able to demonstrate compliance with this
chapter; and
(2) is not eligible to receive a voucher payment under this chapter
until the provider receives notice from the division that the
provider's application under subdivision (1) has been approved.
(d) In determining whether a provider meets the requirements of this
chapter, the division may not consider religious instruction or
activities.
(e) The division may not decertify a provider until there has
been a final determination in a proceeding under IC 4-21.5 that the
provider's license or eligibility is no longer in good standing.
SECTION 5. IC 12-17.2-4-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A child care
center is exempt from licensure under this article if the child care
center complies with all of the requirements in IC 12-17.2-6 for a
child care ministry.
(a) A person may not operate a child care center without a license
issued under this article.
(b) The state or a political subdivision of the state may not operate
a child care center without a license issued under this article.
(c) A person may not operate a child care center where:
(1) the number of children maintained on the premises at any one
(1) time is greater than the number authorized by the license; and
(2) the children are maintained in a building or place not
designated by the license.
(b) A child care center may apply for licensure under this
chapter. If a license is issued to the child care center, the child care
center shall comply with state laws and rules governing licensure
of the child care center.
SECTION 6. IC 12-17.2-4-3.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.6. A child care center's director
must meet one (1) of the following qualifications:
(1) A bachelor of arts or bachelor of science degree from an
accredited college or university in early childhood education
or elementary education with a kindergarten endorsement
and grades of C or better.
(2) Any bachelor of arts or bachelor of science degree from an
accredited college or university must include one (1) of the
following:
(A) Fifteen (15) credit hours in college level courses with
documented content relating to the needs, skills,
development, or teaching methods of children six (6) years
of age or younger and grades of C or better.
(B) A child development associate (CDA).
(3) A two (2) year associate's degree in early childhood
education from an accredited college or university, with a
grade of C or better and a minimum of three (3) years of
experience in an early childhood program.
(4) At least five (5) years working at an administrative level in
a child care center or child care ministry.
SECTION 7. IC 12-17.2-6-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. If registered under this
chapter, a child care center's director must meet one (1) of the
qualifications set forth in IC 12-17.2-4-3.6.
SECTION 8. IC 12-17.2-6-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.187-2021,
SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) An:
(1) unlicensed child care ministry under section 1 of this chapter;
or
(2) unlicensed child care center under IC 12-17.2-4;
may not operate unless the child care ministry or child care center has
registered with and met the requirements of the division and the
department of homeland security. Registration application forms shall
be provided by the division and the department of homeland security.
(b) A registration application under this section must include a
current and valid electronic mail address for the applicant.
(c) Registration under this section expires two (2) years after the
date of issuance unless revoked, modified to a probationary or
suspended status, or voluntarily returned.
SECTION 9. IC 12-17.2-6-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.121-2020,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for denial of an application for registration under this chapter:
(1) A determination by the department of child services of child
abuse or neglect (as defined in IC 31-9-2-14) by:
(A) the applicant;
(B) an employee of the applicant who may be present on the
premises of the child care ministry during operating hours of
the child care ministry; or
(C) a volunteer of the applicant who may be present on the
premises of the child care ministry during operating hours of
the child care ministry.
(2) A criminal conviction of the applicant, or an employee or
volunteer of the applicant who may be present on the premises of
the child care ministry during operating hours of the child care
ministry, of any of the following:
(A) A felony:
(i) related to the health or safety of a child;
(ii) that is a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2);
(iii) that is a dangerous felony; or
(iv) that is not a felony otherwise described in items (i)
through (iii), and less than ten (10) years have elapsed from
the date the person was discharged from probation,
imprisonment, or parole, whichever discharge date is latest.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child care ministry without
a registration under this chapter, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center without
a license under IC 12-17.2-4-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(E) A misdemeanor for operating a child care home without a
license under IC 12-17.2-5-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(3) A determination by the division that the applicant made false
statements in the applicant's application for registration.
(4) A determination by the division that the applicant made false
statements in the records required by the division.
(5) A determination by the division that the applicant previously
operated a:
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(A) child care ministry without a registration under this
chapter;
(B) child care center without a license under IC 12-17.2-4 or
registration under this chapter; or
(C) child care home without a license under IC 12-17.2-5.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) a registration application is denied due to a criminal
conviction of an employee or a volunteer of the applicant; and
(2) the division determines that the employee or volunteer has
been dismissed by the applicant;
the criminal conviction of the former employee or former volunteer
does not require denial of the registration application.
SECTION 10. IC 12-17.2-6-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.121-2020,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) The following constitute sufficient grounds
for revocation of a registration under this chapter:
(1) A determination by the department of child services of child
abuse or neglect (as defined in IC 31-9-2-14) by:
(A) the operator of the child care ministry;
(B) an employee of the child care ministry who may be present
on the premises of the child care ministry during operating
hours of the child care ministry; or
(C) a volunteer of the child care ministry who may be present
on the premises of the child care ministry during operating
hours of the child care ministry.
(2) A criminal conviction of the operator of the child care
ministry, or an employee or volunteer of the child care ministry
who may be present on the premises of the child care ministry
during operating hours of the child care ministry, of any of the
following:
(A) A felony:
(i) related to the health or safety of a child;
(ii) that is a sex offense (as defined in IC 11-8-8-5.2);
(iii) that is a dangerous felony; or
(iv) that is not a felony otherwise described in items (i)
through (iii), and less than ten (10) years have elapsed from
the date the person was discharged from probation,
imprisonment, or parole, whichever discharge date is latest.
(B) A misdemeanor related to the health or safety of a child.
(C) A misdemeanor for operating a child care ministry without
a registration under this chapter, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(D) A misdemeanor for operating a child care center without
a license under IC 12-17.2-4-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(E) A misdemeanor for operating a child care home without a
license under IC 12-17.2-5-35, or a substantially similar
offense in another jurisdiction if the offense is directly or
indirectly related to jeopardizing the health or safety of a child.
(3) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry made false statements in the child care ministry's
registration application.
(4) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry made false statements in the records required by the
division.
(5) A determination by the division that the operator of the child
care ministry previously operated a:
(A) child care ministry without a registration under this
chapter;
(B) child care center without a license under IC 12-17.2-4 or
registration under this chapter; or
(C) child care home without a license under IC 12-17.2-5.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2), if:
(1) a registration is revoked due to a criminal conviction of an
employee or a volunteer of the child care ministry; and
(2) the division determines that the employee or volunteer has
been dismissed by the child care ministry;
the criminal conviction of the former employee or former volunteer
does not require revocation of the registration.
SECTION 11. IC 12-17.2-7.2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.92-2024,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "eligible provider"
refers to a provider that satisfies the following conditions:
(1) The provider is:
(A) a:
(i) child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4 or
registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
(ii) child care home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5; or
(iii) child care ministry registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
that meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level 3 or
Level 4 paths to QUALITY program rating;
(B) a public school, including a charter school;
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(C) a nonpublic school that is accredited by the state board of
education or a national or regional accreditation agency that is
recognized by the state board of education; or
(D) a nonpublic school that is accredited to provide qualified
early education services by an accrediting agency approved by
the office of the secretary.
(2) The provider:
(A) provides qualified early education services to eligible
children, limited eligibility children, and children of child care
employees;
(B) complies with the agreement with the office concerning
the delivery of qualified education services and the use of a
prekindergarten voucher provided under this chapter; and
(C) complies with CCDF provider eligibility standards in
accordance with federal requirements for health and safety.
SECTION 12. IC 16-38-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.130-2021,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Records maintained as part of the
immunization data registry are confidential.
(b) The state department may release information from the
immunization data registry to the individual or to the individual's
parent or guardian if the individual is less than eighteen (18) years of
age.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), the state department may release
information in the immunization data registry concerning an individual
to the following persons or entities:
(1) The immunization data registry of another state.
(2) A provider or a provider's designee.
(3) A local health department.
(4) An elementary or secondary school that is attended by the
individual.
(5) A child care center that is:
(A) licensed under IC 12-17.2-4; or
(B) registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
in which the individual is enrolled.
(6) A child care home that is licensed under IC 12-17.2-5 in
which the individual is enrolled.
(7) A child care ministry that is registered under IC 12-17.2-6 in
which the individual is enrolled.
(8) The office of Medicaid policy and planning or a contractor of
the office of Medicaid policy and planning.
(9) A child placing agency licensed under IC 31-27.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(10) A college or university (as defined in IC 21-7-13-10) that is
attended by the individual.
(11) An entity, including a private entity, for the purpose of
outreach and education to increase immunization rates, if the
following conditions are met:
(A) The entity provides the following written information to
the state department:
(i) Information concerning the proposed outreach and
education, including the information the entity needs from
the immunization data registry.
(ii) How the entity intends to use the information.
(iii) The safeguards the entity will take to protect the identity
of each individual whose records will be released.
(B) The state department determines the proposed safeguards
are adequate to protect the identity of each individual whose
records will be released.
(C) An agreement is executed between the state department
and the entity that specifies the entity's permitted use of the
records and prohibits the release of names of individuals or
any facts that may lead to the identification of an individual.
(12) The United States Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention.
(13) An Indiana nonprofit entity that performs health data services
for health care providers, if the state department executes a data
use agreement with the entity that specifies the permitted use and
disclosure of any released information.
(d) Before immunization data may be released to a person or an
entity, the person or entity must enter into a data use agreement with
the state department that provides that information that identifies a
patient will not be released to any other person or entity without the
written consent of the patient unless the release is to a person or entity
described in subsection (c).
(e) The state department may release summary statistics regarding
information in the immunization data registry to a person or entity that
has entered into a data use agreement with the state department.
SECTION 13. IC 20-27-9-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.168-2022,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) As used in this section, "child care center"
means a nonresidential building where at least one (1) child receives
child care from a provider licensed under IC 12-17.2-4 or registered
under IC 12-17.2-6:
(1) while unattended by a parent;
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(2) for regular compensation; and
(3) for more than four (4) hours but less than twenty-four (24)
hours in each of ten (10) consecutive days per year, excluding
intervening Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a person with a developmental
or physical disability who is provided transportation by a school
corporation by means of a special purpose bus as provided in section
5(a)(3) of this chapter. An individual or entity who transports children
in the care of a:
(1) preschool operated by a school corporation;
(2) public elementary school; or
(3) public secondary school;
on a public highway (as defined in IC 9-25-2-4) within or outside
Indiana shall transport the children only in a school bus, a special
purpose bus, or an appropriate vehicle. The school bus, special purpose
bus, or appropriate vehicle may be used for transportation of the
children to activities or for regular transportation between the
residences of the children and the school.
(c) An individual or entity that transports children in the care of a
child care center on a public highway (as defined in IC 9-25-2-4)
within or outside Indiana in a vehicle designed and constructed for the
accommodation of more than ten (10) passengers shall transport the
children only in a school bus or special purpose bus.
(d) The operator of a:
(1) school bus that transports children as required under
subsection (b) or (c) must meet the requirements of IC 20-27-8;
and
(2) special purpose bus or an appropriate vehicle that transports
children as required under subsection (b) or (c) must meet the
requirements of section 5(c) of this chapter.
(e) This section does not prohibit the use of a public transportation
system for the transportation of children if the motor carriage used is
designed to carry at least twenty (20) passengers.
(f) This section does not prohibit a:
(1) preschool operated by a school corporation;
(2) public elementary school;
(3) public secondary school; or
(4) child care center;
from contracting with a common carrier for incidental charter bus
service for nonregular transportation if the carrier and the carrier's
motor coach comply with the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Regulations
as prescribed by the United States Department of Transportation
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


Federal Highway Administration.
(g) Notwithstanding section 17 of this chapter, a person who
violates this section commits a Class B infraction.
SECTION 14. IC 31-9-2-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2018,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) "Custodian", for purposes of the juvenile
law, means a person with whom a child resides.
(b) "Custodian", for purposes of IC 31-34-1, includes any person
who is:
(1) a license applicant or licensee of:
(A) a foster home or residential child care facility that is
required to be licensed or is licensed under IC 31-27;
(B) a child care center that is required to be licensed or is
licensed under IC 12-17.2-4; or
(C) a child care home that is required to be licensed or is
licensed under IC 12-17.2-5;
(2) a person who is responsible for care, supervision, or welfare
of children while providing services as an owner, operator,
director, manager, supervisor, employee, or volunteer at:
(A) a home, center, or facility described in subdivision (1);
(B) a:
(i) child care ministry, as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.8; or
(ii) child care center;
that is exempt from licensing requirements and is registered or
required to be registered under IC 12-17.2-6;
(C) a home, center, or facility of a child care provider, as
defined in IC 12-7-2-149.1(5);
(D) a home, center, or facility that is the location of a program
that provides child care, as defined in section 16.3 of this
chapter, to serve migrant children and that is exempt from
licensing under IC 12-17.2-2-8(6), whether or not the program
is certified as described in IC 12-17.2-2-9; or
(E) a school, as defined in section 113.5 of this chapter;
(3) a child caregiver, as defined in section 16.4 of this chapter;
(4) a member of the household of the child's noncustodial parent;
or
(5) an individual who has or intends to have direct contact, on a
regular and continuing basis, with a child for whom the individual
provides care and supervision.
SECTION 15. IC 31-9-2-78.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 78.5. "Medical history form", for
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


purposes of IC 31-25-2-29 and IC 31-34-5-6, means a standardized
form prescribed by the department of child services to collect the
following information:
(1) The child's personal medical history, including diagnoses,
hospitalizations, medications, allergies, and any other
significant medical condition.
(2) The known family medical history of the child's biological
parents and other biological relatives, to the extent known to
the biological parent.
SECTION 16. IC 31-25-2-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) The department shall
create and periodically update a medical history form (as defined
in IC 31-9-2-78.5).
(b) The department shall ensure the following:
(1) Each biological parent subject to IC 31-34-5-6 is provided
the medical history form and information on how to complete
the medical history form.
(2) Each person listed under IC 31-34-5-6(c) receives a copy
of the completed medical history form and any updates.
SECTION 17. IC 31-33-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.198-2019,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The department shall initiate an
appropriately thorough child protection assessment of every report of
known or suspected child abuse or neglect the department receives,
whether in accordance with this article or otherwise.
(b) If a report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect is
received from a judge or prosecutor requesting the department to
initiate a child protection assessment, the department shall initiate an
assessment in accordance with this section.
(c) If a report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect is
received from:
(1) medical personnel;
(2) school personnel;
(3) a social worker;
(4) law enforcement officials or personnel;
(5) judiciary personnel; or
(6) prosecuting attorney personnel;
the department shall forward the report to the local office to determine
if the department will initiate an assessment in accordance with this
section.
(d) If the department believes that a child is in imminent danger of
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


serious bodily harm, the department shall initiate an onsite assessment
immediately, but not later than two (2) hours, after receiving the report.
(e) If the report alleges a child may be a victim of child abuse, the
assessment shall be initiated immediately, but not later than
twenty-four (24) hours after receipt of the report.
(f) If reports of child neglect are received, the assessment shall be
initiated within a reasonably prompt time, but not later than five (5)
days, with the primary consideration being the well-being of the child
who is the subject of the report.
(g) If the report alleges that a child lives with a parent, guardian, or
custodian who is married to or lives with a person who:
(1) has been convicted of:
(A) neglect of a dependent under IC 35-46-1-4; or
(B) a battery offense under IC 35-42-4; or
(2) is required to register as a sex or violent offender under
IC 11-8-8;
the department shall initiate an assessment within a reasonably prompt
time, but not later than five (5) days after the department receives the
report, with the primary consideration being the well-being of the child
who is the subject of the report.
(h) If the safety or well-being of a child appears to be endangered or
the facts otherwise warrant, the assessment shall be initiated regardless
of the time of day.
(i) If a report alleges abuse or neglect and involves a child care
ministry or child care center that is exempt from licensure under
IC 12-17.2-6, the department and the appropriate law enforcement
agency shall jointly conduct an investigation. The investigation shall
be conducted under the requirements of this section and section 2(b) of
this chapter.
SECTION 18. IC 31-33-18-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.54-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law,
the reports and other material described in section 1(a) of this chapter
and the unredacted reports and other material described in section 1(b)
of this chapter shall be made available only to the following:
(1) Persons authorized by this article.
(2) A legally mandated public or private child protective agency
investigating a report of child abuse or neglect or treating a child
or family that is the subject of a report or record.
(3) Any of the following who are investigating a report of a child
who may be a victim of child abuse or neglect:
(A) A police officer or other law enforcement agency.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(B) A prosecuting attorney.
(C) A coroner, in the case of the death of a child.
(4) A physician who has before the physician a child whom the
physician reasonably suspects may be a victim of child abuse or
neglect.
(5) An individual legally authorized to place a child in protective
custody if:
(A) the individual has before the individual a child whom the
individual reasonably suspects may be a victim of abuse or
neglect; and
(B) the individual requires the information in the report or
record to determine whether to place the child in protective
custody.
(6) An agency having the legal responsibility or authorization to
care for, treat, or supervise a child who is the subject of a report
or record or a parent, guardian, custodian, or other person who is
responsible for the child's welfare.
(7) An individual named in the report or record who is alleged to
be abused or neglected or, if the individual named in the report is
a child or is otherwise incompetent, the individual's guardian ad
litem or the individual's court appointed special advocate, or both.
(8) Each parent, guardian, custodian, or other person responsible
for the welfare of a child named in a report or record and an
attorney of the person described under this subdivision, with
protection for the identity of reporters and other appropriate
individuals.
(9) A court, for redaction of the record in accordance with section
1.5 of this chapter, or upon the court's finding that access to the
records may be necessary for determination of an issue before the
court. However, except for disclosure of a redacted record in
accordance with section 1.5 of this chapter, access is limited to in
camera inspection unless the court determines that public
disclosure of the information contained in the records is necessary
for the resolution of an issue then pending before the court.
(10) A grand jury upon the grand jury's determination that access
to the records is necessary in the conduct of the grand jury's
official business.
(11) An appropriate state or local official responsible for child
protection services or legislation carrying out the official's official
functions.
(12) The community child protection team appointed under
IC 31-33-3 (or IC 31-6-11-14 before its repeal), upon request, to
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


enable the team to carry out the team's purpose under IC 31-33-3.
(13) A person about whom a report has been made, with
protection for the identity of:
(A) any person reporting known or suspected child abuse or
neglect; and
(B) any other person if the person or agency making the
information available finds that disclosure of the information
would be likely to endanger the life or safety of the person.
(14) An employee of the department, a caseworker, or a juvenile
probation officer conducting a criminal history check under
IC 31-26-5, IC 31-34, or IC 31-37 to determine the
appropriateness of an out-of-home placement for a:
(A) child at imminent risk of placement;
(B) child in need of services; or
(C) delinquent child.
The results of a criminal history check conducted under this
subdivision must be disclosed to a court determining the
placement of a child described in clauses (A) through (C).
(15) A local child fatality review team established under
IC 16-49-2.
(16) The statewide child fatality review committee established by
IC 16-49-4.
(17) The department.
(18) The division of family resources, if the investigation report:
(A) is classified as substantiated; and
(B) concerns:
(i) an applicant for a license to operate;
(ii) a person licensed to operate;
(iii) an employee of; or
(iv) a volunteer providing services at; or
(v) an applicant to register;
a child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4, or a child care
home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5, or a child care center
registered under IC 12-17.2-6.
(19) A citizen review panel established under IC 31-25-2-20.4.
(20) The department of child services ombudsman established by
IC 4-13-19-3.
(21) The secretary of education with protection for the identity of:
(A) any person reporting known or suspected child abuse or
neglect; and
(B) any other person if the person or agency making the
information available finds that disclosure of the information
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


would be likely to endanger the life or safety of the person.
(22) The state child fatality review coordinator employed by the
Indiana department of health under IC 16-49-5-1.
(23) A person who operates a child caring institution, group
home, or secure private facility if all the following apply:
(A) The child caring institution, group home, or secure private
facility is licensed under IC 31-27.
(B) The report or other materials concern:
(i) an employee of;
(ii) a volunteer providing services at; or
(iii) a child placed at;
the child caring institution, group home, or secure private
facility.
(C) The allegation in the report occurred at the child caring
institution, group home, or secure private facility.
(24) A person who operates a child placing agency if all the
following apply:
(A) The child placing agency is licensed under IC 31-27.
(B) The report or other materials concern:
(i) a child placed in a foster home licensed by the child
placing agency;
(ii) a person licensed by the child placing agency to operate
a foster family home;
(iii) an employee of the child placing agency or a foster
family home licensed by the child placing agency; or
(iv) a volunteer providing services at the child placing
agency or a foster family home licensed by the child placing
agency.
(C) The allegations in the report occurred in the foster family
home or in the course of employment or volunteering at the
child placing agency or foster family home.
(25) The National Center for Missing and Exploited Children.
(26) A local domestic violence fatality review team established
under IC 12-18-8, as determined by the department to be relevant
to the death or near fatality that the local domestic violence
fatality review team is reviewing.
(27) The statewide domestic violence fatality review committee
established under IC 12-18-9-3, as determined by the department
to be relevant to the death or near fatality that the statewide
domestic violence fatality review committee is reviewing.
(28) The statewide maternal mortality review committee
established under IC 16-50-1-3, as determined by the department
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


to be relevant to the case of maternal morbidity or maternal
mortality that the statewide maternal mortality review committee
is reviewing.
(29) A local fetal-infant mortality review team established under
IC 16-49-6, as determined by the department to be relevant to the
case of fetal or infant fatality that the local fetal-infant mortality
review team is reviewing.
(30) A suicide and overdose fatality review team established
under IC 16-49.5-2, as determined by the department to be
relevant to the case of a suicide or overdose fatality that the
suicide and overdose fatality review team is reviewing.
(31) The office of administrative law proceedings for a matter that
is the subject of an administrative proceeding before the office of
administrative law proceedings.
(32) A tribal representative, agency, or organization authorized by
the Indian child's tribe to care for, diagnose, treat, review,
evaluate, or monitor active efforts regarding an Indian child, and
the Indian child's parent, guardian, or custodian.
(33) The United States Department of State and foreign
governments to comply with federal law and treaties.
(34) A child advocacy center when the child advocacy center has
before it an investigation of child abuse or neglect in which it is
facilitating a forensic interview or facilitating a case discussion or
case review.
SECTION 19. IC 31-33-22-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2013,
SECTION 318, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (e), a person who intentionally communicates to:
(1) a law enforcement agency; or
(2) the department;
a report of child abuse or neglect knowing the report to be false
commits false reporting, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Level 6 felony if the person has a previous unrelated
conviction for making a report of child abuse or neglect knowing the
report to be false.
(b) A person who intentionally communicates to:
(1) a law enforcement agency; or
(2) the department;
a report of child abuse or neglect knowing the report to be false is
liable to the person accused of child abuse or neglect for actual
damages. The finder of fact may award punitive damages and attorney's
fees in an amount determined by the finder of fact against the person.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


(c) The director or the director's designee shall, after review by the
department's attorney, notify the prosecuting attorney whenever the
director or the director's designee and the department's attorney have
reason to believe that a person has violated this section.
(d) A person who:
(1) has reason to believe that the person is a victim of a false
report of child abuse or neglect under this section; and
(2) is not named in a pending criminal charge or under assessment
relating to the report;
may file a complaint with the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting
attorney shall review the relevant child abuse or neglect records of the
department and any other relevant evidence.
(e) The crime described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if
the:
(1) person has a previous unrelated conviction for making a
report of child abuse or neglect knowing the report to be
false; or
(2) conduct alleged, if true, would constitute a felony under:
(A) IC 35-42;
(B) IC 35-46; or
(C) any other felony offense against a child.
SECTION 20. IC 31-34-5-6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) If a child alleged to be a child in need of services
is taken into custody under IC 31-34-4 and the court orders an
out-of-home placement, the court shall order each biological
parent who retains visitation or parenting time rights to complete
a medical history form:
(1) to the best of the parent's knowledge and belief; and
(2) under penalties of perjury.
(b) The department shall:
(1) provide the medical history form to each biological parent
who is subject to an order under subsection (a);
(2) make reasonable efforts to assist the parent in
understanding and completing the medical history form,
including providing accommodations for language, literacy,
or disability barriers; and
(3) file with the court a copy of each completed medical
history form and a summary of the department's efforts to
obtain a completed medical history form if a biological parent
does not substantially complete the medical history form.
(c) Subject to applicable confidentiality laws, the department
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


shall provide a copy of each completed medical history form, and
any updates to the medical history form, to the following:
(1) The child's foster parent, if any.
(2) A relative caregiver or other out-of-home placement
provider for the child.
(3) Any legal guardian or custodian with whom the child is
placed.
(d) After providing a biological parent with notice and an
opportunity to be heard, the court may temporarily suspend the
biological parent's visitation or parenting time with the child if the
court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) the biological parent is subject to an order under
subsection (a);
(2) the department has complied with subsection (b); and
(3) the biological parent, without good cause, has failed to
make a good faith effort to substantially complete the medical
history form.
(e) In determining whether a biological parent has made a good
faith effort to substantially complete the medical history form, the
court shall consider:
(1) the information reasonably available to the biological
parent concerning the child's medical history;
(2) the information reasonably available to the biological
parent concerning the family medical history of the child's
biological relatives;
(3) any documented barrier to the biological parent's ability
to obtain information, including estrangement or lack of
access to records; and
(4) any other circumstances the court considers relevant.
(f) In deciding whether to suspend visitation or parenting time
under subsection (d), the court shall consider the best interests of
the child, including:
(1) the importance of continued contact with the biological
parent;
(2) the importance of obtaining accurate and complete
medical and family medical history to support the child's
physical and mental health; and
(3) whether a more limited restriction on visitation or
parenting time would be sufficient to secure the biological
parent's compliance.
(g) A suspension ordered under subsection (d):
(1) must be narrowly tailored in duration and scope to
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148


encourage the biological parent's prompt compliance; and
(2) must be reviewed by the court at each periodic case review
or permanency hearing.
(h) A biological parent may, at any time, file an updated or
completed medical history form. If a court finds that the biological
parent has made a good faith effort to substantially complete the
medical history form, the court shall promptly reconsider any
previous order suspending visitation or parenting time.
2026 IN 1106—LS 6444/DI 148